Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Legal Obligations

53-13-30.
Fiduciary duties apply to digital assets; disclosure to fiduciaries; termination of accounts.

The legal duties imposed on a fiduciary charged with managing tangible property apply to the management of digital assets, including the duty of care, loyalty, and confidentiality.

A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s authority with respect to a digital asset of a user:

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-13-10, shall be subject to the applicable terms of service;

Shall be subject to other applicable law, including copyright law;

In the case of a fiduciary, shall be limited by the scope of the fiduciary’s duties; and

May not be used to impersonate the user.

A fiduciary with authority over the property of a decedent, protected person, principal, or settlor has the right to access any digital asset in which the decedent, protected person, principal, or settlor has or had a right or interest and that is not held by a custodian or subject to a terms-of-service agreement.

A fiduciary acting within the scope of the fiduciary’s duties shall be an authorized user of the property of the decedent, protected person, principal, or settlor for the purpose of liability under applicable computer fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 16.

A fiduciary with authority over the tangible, personal property of a decedent, protected person, principal, or settlor shall:

Have the right to access the property and any digital asset stored in it; and

Be an authorized user for the purpose of computer fraud and unauthorized computer access laws, including Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 16.

A custodian may disclose information in an account to a fiduciary of the user when the information is required to terminate an account used to access digital assets licensed to the user.

A fiduciary of a user may request a custodian to terminate the user’s account. A request for termination shall be in writing, in either physical or electronic form, and accompanied by:

If the user is deceased, a certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letters testamentary, letters of administration, or other letters of appointment of the personal representative, court order, power of attorney, or trust giving the fiduciary authority over the account; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user; or

A finding by the court that the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-13-31.
Time for custodian’s compliance with disclosure requests; court order for compliance.

Not later than 60 days after receipt of the information required under Code Sections 53-13-13 through 53-13-30, a custodian shall comply with a request under this chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient to disclose digital assets or terminate an account. If the custodian fails to comply, the fiduciary or designated recipient may apply to the court for an order directing compliance.

An order under subsection (a) of this Code section directing compliance shall contain a finding that compliance is not in violation of 18 U.S.C. Section 2702, in effect on July 1, 2018.

A custodian may notify the user that a request for disclosure or to terminate an account was made under this chapter.

A custodian may deny a request under this chapter from a fiduciary or designated recipient for disclosure of digital assets or to terminate an account if the custodian is aware of any lawful access to the account following the receipt of the fiduciary’s request.

This chapter shall not limit a custodian’s ability to obtain or require a fiduciary or designated recipient requesting disclosure or termination under this chapter to obtain a court order that:

Specifies that an account belongs to the protected person or principal;

Specifies that there is sufficient consent from the protected person or principal to support the requested disclosure; and

Contains a finding required by law other than this chapter.

A custodian and its officers, employees, and agents are immune from liability for an act or omission done in good faith in compliance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.